Vermont, session 2025-2026, H510.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. CHARTER REPEAL APPROVAL
The General Assembly approves the proposal to repeal of the charter of the
Town of Danville as set forth in this act. Voters approved the proposed repeal
on March 4, 2025.
Sec. 2. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 114 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 114. TOWN OF DANVILLE
§ 101. ANNUAL AND SPECIAL MEETINGS
All annual and special meetings of the Town of Danville shall be called and
warned in the manner provided by the laws of the State. All voting on the
VT LEG #382718 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.510
2025 Page 2 of 2
Town budget and the highway budget at all annual and special meetings shall
be by Australian ballot. [Repealed.]
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #382718 v.1